Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 43-117 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The municipal governing body, municipal zoning commission,


municipal board of adjustment, municipal planning commission, or


regional planning commission, in the agenda and minutes of any


meeting where any such body considers a proposed change or amendment


in zoning regulations, shall, in the agenda and minutes of such


meeting, include a brief description of the proposed change or


amendment. Such description shall clearly state the location and


purpose of the proposed change, in addition to any other information


deemed necessary by the municipal clerk.

Req. No. 2337 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 867.3 of Title 19, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The board of county commissioners, county planning commission,


county board of adjustment, or metropolitan area planning


commission, in the agenda and minutes of any meeting where any such


body considers a proposed change or amendment in zoning regulations,


shall, in the agenda and minutes of such meeting, include a brief


description of the proposed change or amendment. Such description


shall clearly state the location and purpose of the proposed change,


in addition to any other information deemed necessary by the county


clerk.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2337 MSBB 1/13/2026 5:20:39 PM



















Req. No. 2337 Page 2